District of Columbia statutes.
1-621.09d

Preparation of studies; enrolled actuary.

The Chief Financial Officer shall:

(1)

Direct the enrolled actuary engaged pursuant to §  1-621.09a to:

(A)

From time to time, prepare an experiential study for the Fund;

(B)

Each fiscal year, prepare an asset allocation study for the Fund, and:

(C)

Prepare such other analyses as are best practice for other post- employment benefits funds or the District of Columbia Retirement Board; and

(2)

Rebid its contract with an enrolled actuary no less frequently than every 5 years.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2109d
as added Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-151, § 2(c), 61 DCR 8893

History